test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_kyeli_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kyeli: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom: kyeli
    kyeli+N+Sg+Gen: kyele
    kyeli+N+Sg+Acc: kyele
    kyeli+N+Sg+Ill: kuálán
    kyeli+N+Sg+Loc: kyeleest
    kyeli+N+Sg+Com: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Sg+Abe: kyelettáá
    kyeli+N+Ess: kyellin
    kyeli+N+Par: kyellid
    kyeli+N+Pl+Nom: kyeleh
    kyeli+N+Pl+Gen: kuolij
    kyeli+N+Pl+Acc: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Ill: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Loc: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Pl+Com: [kuolijguin, kuolijgijn]
    kyeli+N+Pl+Abe: kuolijttáá

    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: kuállám
    kyeli+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: kuállán
    kyeli+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: kuállán
    kyeli+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: kuálásân
    kyeli+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: kyelestân
    kyeli+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: kuolijnân
    kyeli+N+Ess+PxSg1: kyelinân
    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: kuállád
    kyeli+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: kuállád
    kyeli+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: kyeles
    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: kyellis
    kyeli+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: kyelestis    


  Noun - syeji: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    syeji+N+Sg+Nom: syeji
    syeji+N+Sg+Gen: syeje
    syeji+N+Sg+Acc: syeje
    syeji+N+Sg+Ill: suáján
    syeji+N+Sg+Loc: syejeest
    syeji+N+Sg+Com: suoijijn
    syeji+N+Sg+Abe: syejettáá
    syeji+N+Ess: syeijin
    syeji+N+Par: syeijid
    syeji+N+Pl+Nom: syejeh
    syeji+N+Pl+Gen: suojij
    syeji+N+Pl+Acc: suojijd
    syeji+N+Pl+Ill: suoijijd
    syeji+N+Pl+Loc: suojijn
    syeji+N+Pl+Com: [suojijguin, suojijgijn]
    syeji+N+Pl+Abe: suojijttáá

    syeji+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: suáján
    syeji+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: suáján
    syeji+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: suájásân
    syeji+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: syejestân
    syeji+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: suojijnân 
    syeji+N+Ess+PxSg1: syejinân
    syeji+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: suájád
    syeji+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: suájád
    syeji+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: syejes
    syeji+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: suájásâd
    syeji+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: syejestâd
    syeji+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: suojijnâd
    syeji+N+Ess+PxSg2: syejinâd
    syeji+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: syeijis
    syeji+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: syejes
    syeji+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: syejes
    syeji+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: suájásis
    syeji+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: syejestis
    syeji+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: suojijnis
    syeji+N+Ess+PxSg3: syejinis

  Noun - leeji: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    leeji+N+Sg+Nom: leeji
    leeji+N+Sg+Gen: leje
    leeji+N+Sg+Acc: leje
    leeji+N+Sg+Ill: liäján
    leeji+N+Sg+Loc: leejeest
    leeji+N+Sg+Com: leijijn
    leeji+N+Sg+Abe: lejettáá
    leeji+N+Ess: leeijin
    leeji+N+Par: leeijid
    leeji+N+Pl+Nom: lejeh
    leeji+N+Pl+Gen: [leejij, lejij]
    leeji+N+Pl+Acc: leejijd
    leeji+N+Pl+Ill: leijijd
    leeji+N+Pl+Loc: leejijn
    leeji+N+Pl+Com: [lejijguin, lejijgijn]
    leeji+N+Pl+Abe: lejijttáá

  Noun - neeti: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    neeti+N+Sg+Nom: neeti
    neeti+N+Sg+Gen: neđe
    neeti+N+Sg+Acc: neđe
    neeti+N+Sg+Ill: niätán
    neeti+N+Sg+Loc: neeđeest
    neeti+N+Sg+Com: neeđijn
    neeti+N+Sg+Abe: neđettáá
    neeti+N+Ess: neettin
    neeti+N+Par: neettid
    neeti+N+Pl+Nom: neđeh
    neeti+N+Pl+Gen: [neeđij, neđij]
    neeti+N+Pl+Acc: neeđijd
    neeti+N+Pl+Ill: neeđijd
    neeti+N+Pl+Loc: neeđijn
    neeti+N+Pl+Com: [neđijguin, neđijgijn]
    neeti+N+Pl+Abe: neđijttáá

  Noun - peeli: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    peeli+N+Sg+Nom: peeli
    peeli+N+Sg+Gen: pele
    peeli+N+Sg+Acc: pele
    peeli+N+Sg+Ill: piälán
    peeli+N+Sg+Loc: peeleest
    peeli+N+Sg+Com: peelijn
    peeli+N+Sg+Abe: pelettáá
    peeli+N+Ess: peellin
    peeli+N+Par: peellid
    peeli+N+Pl+Nom: peleh
    peeli+N+Pl+Gen: [peelij, pelij]
    peeli+N+Pl+Acc: peelijd
    peeli+N+Pl+Ill: peelijd
    peeli+N+Pl+Loc: peelijn
    peeli+N+Pl+Com: [pelijguin, pelijgijn]
    peeli+N+Pl+Abe: pelijttáá

  Noun - meeri: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    meeri+N+Sg+Nom: meeri
    meeri+N+Sg+Gen: mere
    meeri+N+Sg+Acc: mere
    meeri+N+Sg+Ill: miärán
    meeri+N+Sg+Loc: meereest
    meeri+N+Sg+Com: meerijn
    meeri+N+Sg+Abe: merettáá
    meeri+N+Ess: meerrin
    meeri+N+Par: meerrid
    meeri+N+Pl+Nom: mereh
    meeri+N+Pl+Gen: [meerij, merij]
    meeri+N+Pl+Acc: meerijd
    meeri+N+Pl+Ill: meerijd
    meeri+N+Pl+Loc: meerijn
    meeri+N+Pl+Com: [merijguin, merijgijn]
    meeri+N+Pl+Abe: merijttáá
